Illinois, session 104th, SB3688.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Medical School Curriculum Act is amended by 5adding Section 3 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 55/3 new)7    Sec. 3. Menopause education required. In addition to the 8requirements imposed by this Act, each and every medical 9school established, maintained, and operated by the State of 10Illinois shall include in the curriculum the study of 11perimenopause and menopause recognition and management. Such 12study may be by specific courses in perimenopause and 13menopause or may be incorporated in existing subjects taught 14in the school. 15    Section 10. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 16Sections 55-5 and 60-5 as follows: 17    (225 ILCS 65/55-5)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)19    Sec. 55-5. LPN education program requirements.20    (a) All Illinois practical nurse education programs must 21be reviewed by the Board and approved by the Department before   SB3688 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19957 BAB 33407 b1the successful completion of such a program may be applied 2toward meeting the requirements for practical nurse licensure 3under this Act. Any program changing the level of educational 4preparation or the relationship with or to the parent 5institution or establishing an extension of an existing 6program must request a review by the Board and approval by the 7Department. The Board shall review and make a recommendation 8for the approval or disapproval of a program by the Department 9based on the following criteria:10        (1) a feasibility study that describes the need for 11    the program and the facilities used, the potential of the 12    program to recruit faculty and students, financial support 13    for the program, and other criteria, as established by 14    rule;15        (2) program curriculum, including the study of 16    perimenopause and menopause recognition and management, 17    that meets all State requirements;18        (3) the administration of the program by a Nurse 19    Administrator and the involvement of a Nurse Administrator 20    in the development of the program; and21        (4) the occurrence of a site visit prior to approval.22    (b) In order to obtain initial Department approval and to 23maintain Department approval, a practical nursing program must 24meet all of the following requirements:25        (1) The program must continually be administered by a 26    Nurse Administrator.  SB3688 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19957 BAB 33407 b1        (2) The institution responsible for conducting the 2    program and the Nurse Administrator must ensure that 3    individual faculty members are academically and 4    professionally competent.5        (3) The program curriculum must contain all applicable 6    requirements established by rule, including both theory 7    and clinical components.8        (4) The passage rates of the program's graduating 9    classes on the State-approved licensure exam must be 10    deemed satisfactory by the Department.11    (c) Program site visits to an institution conducting or 12hosting a practical nursing program may be made at the 13discretion of the Nursing Coordinator or upon recommendation 14of the Board.15    (d) Any institution conducting a practical nursing program 16that wishes to discontinue the program must do each of the 17following:18        (1) Notify the Department, in writing, of its intent 19    to discontinue the program.20        (2) Continue to meet the requirements of this Act and 21    the rules adopted thereunder until the official date of 22    termination of the program.23        (3) Notify the Department of the date on which the 24    last student shall graduate from the program and the 25    program shall terminate.26        (4) Assist remaining students in the continuation of   SB3688 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19957 BAB 33407 b1    their education in the event of program termination prior 2    to the graduation of the program's final student.3        (5) Upon the closure of the program, notify the 4    Department, in writing, of the location of student and 5    graduate records storage.6(Source: P.A. 95-639, eff. 10-5-07.) 7    (225 ILCS 65/60-5)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)9    Sec. 60-5. RN education program requirements; out-of-State 10programs.11    (a) All registered professional nurse education programs 12must be reviewed by the Board and approved by the Department 13before the successful completion of such a program may be 14applied toward meeting the requirements for registered 15professional nurse licensure under this Act. Any program 16changing the level of educational preparation or the 17relationship with or to the parent institution or establishing 18an extension of an existing program must request a review by 19the Board and approval by the Department. The Board shall 20review and make a recommendation for the approval or 21disapproval of a program by the Department based on the 22following criteria:23        (1) a feasibility study that describes the need for 24    the program and the facilities used, the potential of the 25    program to recruit faculty and students, financial support   SB3688 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19957 BAB 33407 b1    for the program, and other criteria, as established by 2    rule;3        (2) program curriculum, including the study of 4    perimenopause and menopause recognition and management, 5    that meets all State requirements;6        (2.5) measurement of program effectiveness based on a 7    passage rate of all graduates over the 3 most recent 8    calendar years without reference to first-time test 9    takers; 10        (3) the administration of the program by a Nurse 11    Administrator and the involvement of a Nurse Administrator 12    in the development of the program;13        (4) the occurrence of a site visit prior to approval; 14    and15        (5) beginning December 31, 2022, obtaining and 16    maintaining programmatic accreditation by a national 17    accrediting body for nursing education recognized by the 18    United States Department of Education and approved by the 19    Department.20    The Department and Board of Nursing shall be notified 21within 30 days if the program loses its accreditation. The 22Department may adopt rules regarding a warning process and 23reaccreditation. 24    (b) In order to obtain initial Department approval and to 25maintain Department approval, a registered professional 26nursing program must meet all of the following requirements:  SB3688 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19957 BAB 33407 b1        (1) The institution responsible for conducting the 2    program and the Nurse Administrator must ensure that 3    individual faculty members are academically and 4    professionally competent.5        (2) The program curriculum must contain all applicable 6    requirements established by rule, including both theory 7    and clinical components.8        (3) The passage rates of the program's graduating 9    classes on the State-approved licensure exam must be 10    deemed satisfactory by the Department.11    (c) Program site visits to an institution conducting or 12hosting a professional nursing program may be made at the 13discretion of the Nursing Coordinator or upon recommendation 14of the Board. Full routine site visits may be conducted by the 15Department for periodic evaluation. Such visits shall be used 16to determine compliance with this Act. Full routine site 17visits must be announced and may be waived at the discretion of 18the Department if the program maintains accreditation with an 19accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of 20Education and approved by the Department.21    (d) Any institution conducting a registered professional 22nursing program that wishes to discontinue the program must do 23each of the following:24        (1) Notify the Department, in writing, of its intent 25    to discontinue the program.26        (2) Continue to meet the requirements of this Act and   SB3688 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19957 BAB 33407 b1    the rules adopted thereunder until the official date of 2    termination of the program.3        (3) Notify the Department of the date on which the 4    last student shall graduate from the program and the 5    program shall terminate.6        (4) Assist remaining students in the continuation of 7    their education in the event of program termination prior 8    to the graduation of the program's final student.9        (5) Upon the closure of the program, notify the 10    Department, in writing, of the location of student and 11    graduate records' storage.12    (e) Out-of-State registered professional nursing education 13programs planning to offer clinical practice experiences in 14this State must meet the requirements set forth in this 15Section and must meet the clinical and faculty requirements 16for institutions outside of this State, as established by 17rule. The institution responsible for conducting an 18out-of-State registered professional nursing education program 19and the administrator of the program shall be responsible for 20ensuring that the individual faculty and preceptors overseeing 21the clinical experience are academically and professionally 22competent. 23(Source: P.A. 103-533, eff. 1-1-24.) 24    Section 15. The Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987 25is amended by changing Section 13 as follows:   SB3688 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19957 BAB 33407 b1    (225 ILCS 95/13)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4613)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)3    Sec. 13. Department powers and duties. 4    (a) Subject to the provisions of this Act, the Department 5shall:6        (1) adopt rules setting forth standards to be met by a 7    school or institution offering a course of training for 8    physician assistants prior to approval of such school or 9    institution, including the study of perimenopause and 10    menopause recognition and management;11        (2) adopt rules setting forth uniform and reasonable 12    standards of instruction to be met prior to approval of 13    such course of institution for physician assistants; and14        (3) determine the reputability and good standing of 15    such schools or institutions and their course of 16    instruction for physician assistants by reference to 17    compliance with such rules, provided that no school of 18    physician assistants that refuses admittance to applicants 19    solely on account of race, color, sex, or creed shall be 20    considered reputable and in good standing.21    (b) No rule shall be adopted under this Act which allows a 22physician assistant to perform any act, task, or function 23primarily performed in the lawful practice of optometry under 24the Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987.25    (c) All rules shall be submitted to the Board for review   SB3688 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19957 BAB 33407 b1and the Department shall consider any comments provided by the 2Board. 3(Source: P.A. 100-453, eff. 8-25-17.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 51, 2027.